Washington statutes.
RCW 5.62.030

Nurse-patient privilege subject to limitations and exemptions of physician-patient privilege.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, the privilege created in this chapter is subject to the same limitations and exemptions contained in RCW 26.44.060(3) and 51.04.050 as those limitations and exemptions relate to the physician/patient privilege of RCW 5.60.060.

[ 2002 c 302 s 702; 1986 c 212 s 2; 1985 c 447 s 3.]